Washington statutes.
RCW 43.59.070

Director's duties—Staff—Rules and regulations.

The director shall be secretary of the commission and shall be responsible for carrying into effect the commission's orders and rules and regulations promulgated by the commission. The director shall also be authorized to employ such staff as is necessary pursuant to the provisions of chapter 41.06 RCW. The commission shall adopt such rules and regulations as shall be necessary to carry into effect the purposes of this chapter.

[ 1967 ex.s. c 147 s 8.]